pl: Orientacja haka Flyer: Lewa; Prawa; Uniwersalna / Dwustronna; Inna
zh-CN: 飞钩方向: 左侧; 右侧; 通用/可翻转; 其他
nb: Orientering av flygebladkrok: Venstre; Høyre; Universell/reversibel; Annet
ja: フライヤーフックの向き: 左; 右; ユニバーサル/リバーシブル; その他
fr: Orientation du crochet de l’épinglier: Gauche; Droite; Universel / Réversible; Autre
hu: Szárnyas kampó tájolása: Bal; Jobb; Univerzális / Megfordítható; Egyéb
ro-RO: Orientarea cârligului tip flyer: Stânga; Dreapta; Universal/Reversibil; Altele
de: Ausrichtung des Flügelhakens: Links; Rechts; Universell/Umkehrbar; Sonstiges
tr: Yapay sinek kancası yönü: Sol; Sağ; Evrensel/Çift taraflı; Diğer
es: Orientación del gancho del volante: Izquierda; Derecha; Universal/reversible; Otro
sl-SI: Orientacija kljuke letaka: Levo; Desno; Univerzalno/obojestransko; Drugo
lt-LT: Skrajutės kablio orientacija: Kairė; Dešinė; Universalus / dvipusis; Kita
cs: Orientace napínače příze: Vlevo; Vpravo; Univerzální/oboustranné; Ostatní
el: Προσανατολισμός αγκίστρου του ιπτάμενου αντικειμένου: Αριστερά; Δεξιά; Γενικής χρήσης/Αναστρέψιμο; Άλλο
vi: Hướng móc ruồi câu cá: Trái; Phải; Phổ quát/Có thể đảo ngược; Khác
pt-BR: Orientação do gancho da sala: Esquerda; Direita; Universal/Reversível; Outro
sv: Flyerkrokens orientering: Vänster; Höger; Universell/vändbar; Övrigt
da: Retning af flyer-krog: Venstre; Højre; Universel/vendbar; Andet
zh-TW: 飛翼鉤方向: 左; 右; 通用/雙向; 其他
nl: Vluchthaak oriëntatie: Links; Rechts; Universeel/omkeerbaar; Overige
it: Orientamento del gancio del volantino: Sinistra; Destra; Universale/reversibile; Altro
fi: Lankaohjaimen suunta: Vasen; Oikea; Yleiskäyttö/Käännettävä; Muu
ru: Ориентация крючка нахлыста: Левая; Правая; Универсальная/двусторонняя; Другое
pt-PT: orientação do gancho do folheto: Esquerda; Direita; Universal/reversível; Outro
bg-BG: Ориентация на куката тип „флаер“: Лява; Дясна; Универсална/обръщаема; Друга
hr-HR: Orijentacija kuke za letak: Lijevo; Desno; Univerzalno / reverzibilno; Ostalo
sk-SK: Orientácia háčika letky: Vľavo; Vpravo; Univerzálna/obojstranná; Iné
ko: 플라이어 후크 방향: 왼쪽; 오른쪽; 범용/양방향; 기타
th: การวางแนวตะขอเกี่ยวเครื่องปั่นด้าย: ซ้าย; ขวา; ทั่วไป/พลิกกลับได้; อื่นๆ
en: Flyer hook orientation: Left; Right; Universal/Reversible; Other